Hawaii, session 2026, SB1047.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that body cameras for all adult correctional officers would help deter sexual assaults and contraband, thereby building a defense against future lawsuits and protecting inmates from rogue adult correctional officers. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds for the purchase of body cameras for adult correctional officers to wear while on duty at state correctional facilities. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to purchase body cameras for adult correctional officers to wear while on duty at state correctional facilities. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of corrections and rehabilitation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________